Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-505
Sanitary district trustees; election; organization; officers; corporate powers.

Upon the organization of any such sanitary district the county board shall call an election for the election of trustees, who shall hold their offices until their successors are elected and qualified. Where such sanitary district does not contain a city of more than forty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, there shall be three trustees, and where such sanitary district contains a city of more than forty thousand inhabitants as so determined, there shall be five trustees. In districts having three trustees, at the first general state election held in November after the organization of the district, there shall be elected one trustee for a term of two years and two trustees for a term of four years, and thereafter their respective successors shall be elected for a term of four years at the general state election held in November immediately prior to the expiration of their respective terms. In districts having five trustees, at the first general state election held in November after the organization of the district, there shall be elected two trustees for a term of two years and three trustees for a term of four years, and thereafter their respective successors shall be elected for a term of four years at the general state election held in November immediately prior to the expiration of their respective terms. At the first meeting after election of one or more members, the board shall elect one of their number president and, in case they fail to elect, then the member who at his or her election received the highest number of votes shall be president of such board. Such district shall be a body corporate and politic by name of Sanitary District of .............., with power to sue, be sued, contract, acquire and hold property, and adopt a common seal.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 2, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 1926;

C.S.1922, § 1867;

C.S.1929, § 31-605;

Laws 1943, c. 75, § 3, p. 259;

R.S.1943, § 31-505;

Laws 1949, c. 81, § 1, p. 214;

Laws 2019, LB67, § 7.